West Virginia, session 2026, SB492.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12o. Additional modification reducing federal adjusted gross income relating to taxes on tips and overtime. (a) In addition to amounts authorized to be subtracted from federal gross income pursuant to §11-21-12 of this code, a modification reducing federal adjusted gross income is hereby authorized for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029, in an amount equal to the sum of the following deductions allowed on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return for the same tax year for the following:(1) Qualified tips under 26 U.S.C. § 224 of the Internal Revenue Code; and(2) Qualified overtime compensation under 26 U.S.C. § 225 of the Internal Revenue Code.(b) For a nonresident, only qualified tips and overtime compensation that are attributable to services performed in this state may be eligible for the reducing modification.(c) In addition to amounts authorized to be subtracted from federal gross income pursuant to §11-21-12 of this code, a modification reducing federal adjusted gross income is hereby authorized for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2029, for the following:(1) Qualified tips in accordance with the provisions of W.Va. C.S.R. §42-8-12 et seq. up to $25,000 annually.(A) The reducing modification phases out for taxpayers with modified adjusted gross incomes over $150,000.(B) The reducing modification is available regardless of the type of return form filed.(2)		 Qualified overtime compensation paid by an employer in accordance with the provisions of §21-5C-3 of this code up to $12,500 annually.(A) The reducing modification phases out for taxpayers with modified adjusted gross incomes over $150,000.(B) The reducing modification is available regardless of the type of return form filed.(d) For a nonresident, only qualified tips and overtime compensation that are attributable to services performed in this state may be eligible for the reducing modification.